Utah statutes.
17-24-12.   Reports to county executive or legislative body.
Each county treasurer shall make a detailed report whenever required so to do
by the county executive or by the legislative body at any of their regular or
special meetings of all money received by the treasurer, and of disbursements
thereof, and of all other proceedings in the treasurer's office so that the
receipts into the treasury and the amount of disbursements shall clearly and
distinctly appear.
